Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 1. Erection of Lines; Rights-of-Way; Eminent Domain, etc.
§ 56-466.2.
Undergrounding existing overhead distribution lines; relocation of facilities of cable operator.

When an investor-owned incumbent electric utility proposes to improve electric service reliability pursuant to clause (iv) of subdivision A 6 of § 56-585.1 by installing new underground facilities to replace the utility’s existing overhead distribution
tap lines, if the utility owns the poles from which the existing overhead distribution tap lines are to be relocated and any cable operator of a cable television system, as those terms are defined in §

15.2-2108.19

, has also attached its facilities to such poles, the utility shall provide written notice to the cable operator of the utility’s intention to relocate the overhead distribution tap lines not less than 90 days prior to
relocating the utility’s overhead distribution lines. The cable operator shall notify the utility within 45 days of the notice of relocation whether the cable operator will relocate its facilities underground or request to remain overhead
in accordance with the provisions set forth herein. If the cable operator elects to relocate its facilities underground, in such notice the cable operator may request that the utility use commercially reasonable efforts to negotiate
a common shared underground easement for the facilities to be located underground of the utility and the cable operator. The cable operator shall be responsible to negotiate any additional easements that it may require. If the cable
operator elects to relocate its facilities underground, the cable operator may participate with the utility in a joint relocation of the overhead lines to underground or may engage its own contractors to undertake its relocation work
if it deems it appropriate to do so. The utility shall not abandon or remove the poles that the utility owns until the cable operator completes the relocation or removal of its facilities or 90 days after the completion of the relocation
of the utility overhead distribution lines, whichever first occurs. If the cable operator does not elect to relocate its facilities underground and requests to maintain its facilities overhead, the utility may either (i) convey such
poles “as-is” and “where-is” to the cable operator at its depreciated cost less the estimated cost of removal, provided that the cable operator may legally retain the poles that the utility intends to abandon and assumes all liability
for the poles conveyed or (ii) retain ownership of its poles and allow the cable operator’s existing overhead facilities to remain attached, in which case the utility shall maintain the pole in accordance with prudent utility standards,
provided that the cable operator shall continue to pay its pole attachment fees and otherwise comply with its contractual obligations pursuant to the applicable pole attachment agreement. In all cases, the cable operator shall be responsible
for all costs related to the relocation or maintenance of its facilities.

In instances in which an investor-owned incumbent electric utility continues to own and maintain its utility poles after the overhead distribution lines of the utility formerly on such poles have been placed underground pursuant to the foregoing provisions,
then for purposes of any agreement or ordinance with respect to a cable franchise under §

15.2-2108.20

or

15.2-2108.21

, the utility shall not be deemed to have converted to underground.

History.
2017, c. 583; 2018, c. 296.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2017, c. 583, cl. 3 was codified as this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 20 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall apply to any applications pending with the State Corporation Commission regarding new underground facilities or offshore wind facilities on or after January 1, 2018.”

Acts 2018, c. 296, cl. 24 provides: “That this act shall be known as the Grid Transformation and Security Act.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 296 rewrote the section. For applicability, see Editor’s note.

§ 56-467.
Restoring condition of ground.

The portions of the surface of the parks, roads, turnpikes, streets, avenues, or alleys, or of any pavements opened up or disturbed in erecting, repairing, laying or replacing poles, wires, or cables, or in repairing conduits under the provisions of this
chapter shall be immediately restored to and maintained in good condition by the company doing such work; and in case of the failure of such company to restore and maintain the same, the corporate authorities of the city or town, or
the board of supervisors or other governing authority of the county, or the chairman of the Commonwealth Transportation Board, as the case may be, may properly restore and maintain the same, and the costs thereof may be recovered by
the city or town, or county, or Commonwealth, from such company, in any court of competent jurisdiction.

History.
Code 1919, § 4037; 1926, p. 908.

§ 56-468.
Endangering life or limb by stringing wires across other works.

Whoever shall hereafter erect, string, or maintain wires for any telephone or telegraph lines, over or across the works, in this Commonwealth, of any company chartered as a work of internal improvement in any manner so as to endanger the lives or limbs
of the employees of such company, or other person, shall, for each offense, be fined not less than $100 nor more than $500.

History.
Code 1919, § 4049.

Cross references.

As to the duty of corporation to support wires crossing other public works, see § 56-33.

As to unlawful use of, or injury to, telephone and telegraph lines, see §

18.2-164

.

§ 56-468.1.
(Contingent expiration — see Editor’s note) Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee.

As used in this article:“Access lines” are defined to include residence and business telephone lines and other switched (packet or circuit) lines connecting the customer premises to the public switched telephone network for the transmission of outgoing
voice-grade telecommunications services. Centrex, PBX, or other multistation telecommunications services will incur a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on every line or trunk (Network Access Registrar or PBX trunk) that allows simultaneous
unrestricted outward dialing to the public switched network. ISDN Primary Rate Interface services will be charged five Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees for every ISDN Primary Rate Interface network facility established by the customer.
Other channelized services in which each voice-grade channel is controlled by the telecommunications service provider shall be charged one fee for each line that allows simultaneous unrestricted outward dialing to the public switched
telephone network. Access lines do not include local, state, and federal government lines; access lines used to provide service to users as part of the Virginia Universal Service Plan; interstate and intrastate dedicated WATS lines;
special access lines; off-premises extensions; official lines internally provided and used by providers of telecommunications service for administrative, testing, intercept, and verification purposes; and commercial mobile radio
service.“Cable operator” and “cable system” have the same meanings as contained in subsection A of §

15.2-2108.1:1

.“Centrex” means a business telephone service offered by a local exchange company from a local central office; a normal single line telephone service with added custom calling features including but not limited to
intercom, call forwarding, and call transfer.“ISDN Primary Rate Interface” means digital communications service containing 24 bearer channels, each of which is a full 64,000 bits-per-second.“Locality” has the same meaning as contained
in §

15.2-102

.“Network Access Register” means a central office register associated with Centrex service that is required in order to complete a call involving access to the public switched telephone network outside the confines
of that Centrex company. Network Access Register may be incoming, outgoing, or two-way.“New installation of telecommunications facilities” or “new installation” includes the construction of new pole lines and new conduit systems,
and the burying of new cables in existing public rights-of-way. New installation does not include adding new cables to existing pole lines and conduit systems.“PBX” means public branch exchange and is telephone switching equipment
owned by the customer and located on the customer’s premises.“PBX trunk” means a connection of the customer’s PBX switch to the central office.“Provider of local telecommunications service” means a public service corporation or
locality holding a certificate issued by the State Corporation Commission to provide local exchange telephone service and any other person who provides local telephone services to the public for a fee, other than a CMRS provider
as that term is defined in § 56-484.12.“Provider of telecommunications service” means a public service corporation or locality holding a certificate issued by the State Corporation Commission to provide local exchange or interexchange
telephone service to the public for a fee and any other person who provides local or long distance telephone services to the public for a fee, other than a CMRS provider as that term is defined in § 56-484.12.“Public highway” means,
for purposes of computing the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee, the centerline mileage of highways and streets which are part of the primary state highway system as defined in §

33.2-100

, the secondary state highway system as defined in §§

33.2-100

and

33.2-324

, the highways of those cities and certain towns defined in §

33.2-119

and the highways and streets maintained and operated by counties which have withdrawn or elect to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly
of 1932 and which have not elected to return.“Subscriber” means a person who receives video programming, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 522(20), distributed by a cable operator, as defined in subsection A of §

15.2-2108.1:1

, and does not further distribute it.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, there is hereby established a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to replace any and all fees of general application (except for zoning, subdivision, site plan and comprehensive plan fees of general application) otherwise
chargeable to a provider of telecommunications service by the Commonwealth Transportation Board or a locality in connection with a permit for such occupation and use granted in accordance with § 56-458 or § 56-462. Cities
and towns whose public streets and roads are not maintained by the Virginia Department of Transportation, and any county that has withdrawn or elects to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the provisions
of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932, may impose the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on the ultimate end-users of local telecommunications service only by local ordinance. Localities, their authorities or
commissions, and the Commonwealth Transportation Board may allow providers of telecommunications services and cable operators to use their electric poles or electric conduits in exchange for payment of a fee. B. 1. Notwithstanding
any other provisions of law, there is hereby established a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to replace any and all fees of general application (except for zoning, subdivision, site plan and comprehensive plan fees of general
application) otherwise chargeable to a provider of telecommunications service by the Commonwealth Transportation Board or a locality in connection with a permit for such occupation and use granted in accordance with § 56-458
or § 56-462. Cities and towns whose public streets and roads are not maintained by the Virginia Department of Transportation, and any county that has withdrawn or elects to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways
under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932, may impose the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on the ultimate end-users of local telecommunications service only by local ordinance. Localities,
their authorities or commissions, and the Commonwealth Transportation Board may allow providers of telecommunications services and cable operators to use their electric poles or electric conduits in exchange for payment
of a fee.

The Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee established by this section is hereby imposed on all cable operators that use the public rights-of-way.

The amount of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall be calculated annually by the Department of Transportation (VDOT), based on the calculations described in subsection D of this section. In no year shall the amount of the fee be less than $0.50 per
access line per month.

The annual rate of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall be calculated by multiplying the number of public highway miles in the Commonwealth by a highway mileage rate (as defined in subsection E of this section), and by adding the number of feet of new
installations in the Commonwealth (multiplied by $1 per foot), and dividing this sum by the total number of access lines in the Commonwealth. The monthly rate shall be this annual rate divided by 12.

The annual multiplier per mile is $425 per mile beginning July 1, 2001 and thereafter.

The data used for the calculation in subsection D shall be based on the following information and schedule: (i) all providers of telecommunications services shall remit to VDOT by December 1 of each year data indicating the number of feet of new installations
made during the one-year period ending September 30 of that year, which shall be auditable by affected localities, and the number of access lines as of September 30 of that year, which shall be auditable by affected localities;
and (ii) the public highway mileage from the most recently published VDOT report. By the following January 15, VDOT shall calculate the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to be used in the fiscal year beginning the next ensuing July
1 and report it to all affected localities and providers of local telecommunications services.

A provider of local telecommunications service shall collect the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on a per access line basis and the cable operator shall collect the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on a per subscriber basis by adding the fee to each ultimate
end user’s monthly bill for local telecommunications service or cable service. A company providing both local telecommunications service and cable service to the same ultimate end user may collect only one Public Rights-of-Way
Use Fee from that ultimate end user based on (i) the local telecommunications service if the locality in which the ultimate end user resides has imposed a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on local telecommunications service or (ii)
cable service if the locality in which the subscriber resides has not imposed a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on local telecommunications service. The Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall, when billed, be stated as a distinct item
separate and apart from the monthly charge for local telecommunications service and cable service. Until the ultimate end user pays the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to the local telecommunications service provider or cable operator,
the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall constitute a debt of the consumer to the locality, VDOT, or the Department of Taxation, as may be applicable. If any ultimate end user or subscriber refuses to pay the Public Rights-of-Way
Use Fee, the local telecommunications service provider or cable operator shall notify the locality, VDOT, or the Department of Taxation, as appropriate. All fees collected in accordance with the provisions of this section shall
be deemed to be held in trust by the local telecommunications service provider and the cable operator until remitted to the locality, VDOT, or the Department of Taxation, as applicable.

Within two months after the end of each calendar quarter, each provider of local telecommunications service shall remit the amount of Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees it has billed to ultimate end users during such preceding quarter, as follows:

The provider of local telecommunications service shall remit directly to the applicable locality all Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees billed in (i) cities; (ii) towns whose public streets and roads are not maintained by VDOT; and (iii) any county that has
withdrawn or elects to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 and that has elected not to return, provided, however, that such counties
shall use a minimum of 10% of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees they receive for transportation construction or maintenance purposes. Any city currently subject to §

15.2-3530

shall use a minimum of 90% of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees it receives for transportation construction or maintenance purposes.

The Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees billed in all other counties shall be remitted by each provider of local telecommunications service to VDOT. VDOT shall allocate the total amount received from providers to the construction improvement program of the
secondary system of state highways. Within such allocation to the secondary system, VDOT shall apportion the amounts so received among the several counties, other than those described in clause (iii) of subdivision 1, on
the basis of population, with each county being credited a share of the total equal to the proportion that its population bears to the total population of all such counties. For purposes of this section the term “population”
shall mean either population according to the latest United States census or the latest population estimate of the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service of the University of Virginia, whichever is more recent. Such allocation
and apportionment of Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other allocation of funds to such secondary system and apportionment to counties thereof provided by law.

The Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee billed by a cable operator shall be remitted to the Department of Taxation for deposit into the Communication Sales and Use Tax Trust Fund by the twentieth day of the month following the billing of the fee.

Any locality with a franchise agreement, ordinance implementing a franchise agreement or other form of consent allowing the use of the public rights-of-way by a provider of local telecommunications service, existing prior to July 1, 1998, or any city
or town with an ordinance or code section imposing a franchise fee or charge on a provider of local telecommunications service in effect as of February 1, 1997, may elect to continue enforcing such existing franchise, ordinance
or code section or other form of consent in lieu of receiving the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee; provided, however, that such city or town does not (i) discriminate among telecommunications service providers and (ii) adopt any additional
rights-of-way management practices that do not comply with §§ 56-458 C and 56-462 C. The Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall not be imposed in any such locality.Any locality electing to adopt the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee by
ordinance shall notify all affected providers of local telecommunications service no later than March 15 preceding the fiscal year. Such notice shall be in writing and sent by certified mail from such locality to the registered
agent of the affected provider or providers of local telecommunications service.

History.
1998, cc. 742, 758; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2006, c. 780.

Cross references.

As to regulation of fees, rates and services of cable television systems, see §

15.2-2108.22

et seq.

As to regulation of use of public rights-of-way by franchised cable operators, see §

15.2-2108.23

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, cc. 742 and 758, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any county having the county manager form of government.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 3 provides: “That the local consumer utility tax imposed on franchised cable services, local telecommunications services, and local mobile telecommunications are repealed, notwithstanding any contrary provision of any local charter,
special act, or general law.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 4 provides: “That all taxes and fees imposed in accordance with the provisions of any Code of Virginia section or any local charter that are repealed or otherwise amended by this act and that remain unpaid as of January 1, 2007,
shall be subject to payment and collection in accordance with any administrative or judicial remedies existing prior or subsequent to this act’s enactment and any bad debt associated with such taxes and fees that occurs after January
1, 2007, shall be offset against revenues collected from the Communications Sales and Use Tax.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of the eighth enactment of this act shall be effective beginning on July 1, 2006, and the remaining provisions of this act, with the exception of §

58.1-656

of the Code of Virginia, shall be effective beginning on January 1, 2007.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 8 provides: “That the Auditor of Public Accounts (APA) shall determine the amount of revenues received by every county, city, and town for the fiscal year commencing July 1, 2005, and ending June 30, 2006, at rates adopted on or
before January 1, 2006, for each of the following taxes and fees collected by the service providers: gross receipts tax in excess of 0.5%, local consumer utility tax, video program excise tax, cable franchise fee, and 911 taxes and
fees, where they are collected. Based on each locality’s percentage of the total Fiscal Year 2006 receipts from these sources, the APA shall calculate each locality’s percentage share of future distributions of the Telecommunications
Sales and Use Tax by the Department of Taxation. Local governments and service providers shall cooperate with the APA and provide information to him as requested. Every town with a population of less than 3,500, and any other county,
city, or town whose annual audited financial statement cannot be completed by October 1, 2006, shall provide to the APA by that date a statement of its receipts during Fiscal Year 2006 from such telecommunications and cable sources,
verified in writing by an independent certified public accountant. Any locality that fails to furnish the information required to make this calculation in a timely manner shall not be entitled to participate in the distribution of
such tax, and its percentage share shall be disregarded in calculating the distribution to other localities. The APA or his agent shall not divulge any information acquired by him in the performances of his duties under this section
that may identify specific service providers. The APA shall report his findings on a tax-by-tax basis to the chairmen of the House and Senate Finance Committees and the Department of Taxation no later than December 1, 2006. Further,
the APA shall collect annually from local governments and service providers the necessary data to determine changes in: (i) market area and number of customers served, (ii) types of services available, (iii) population, and (iv) possible
local reimbursement. The APA shall report his findings to the Chairmen of the House and Senate Committees on Finance no later than December 1 each year.”

Acts 2006, c. 780, cl. 9 provides: “That if any of the provisions of this act are declared invalid in a nonappealable court order, then the remaining provisions of this act shall be invalid and the provisions of §§

15.2-2108

, 56-468.1, 56-484.4, 56-484.5, 56-484.6, 56-484.12,

58.1-3812

,

58.1-3813.1

,

58.1-3815

,

58.1-3816.2

, and

58.1-3818.1

through 58.1-3818.7 of the Code of Virginia and the third enactment clause of Chapter 858 of the 1972 Acts of Assembly as they were in effect immediately prior to the effective date of this act shall be given effect beginning
90 days after the nonappealable court order is issued.”

Prior to 2006 amendment by Acts 2006, c. 780, § 56-468.1 read:

“

§ 56-468.1. Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee.
— A. As used in this article:

‘Access lines’ are defined to include residence and business telephone lines and other switched common lines connecting the customer premises to the end office switch. Access lines do not include local, state, and federal government lines; access lines
used to provide service to users as part of the Virginia Universal Service Plan; interstate and intrastate dedicated WATS lines; special access lines; off-premises extensions; official lines used by providers of telecommunications
service for administrative, testing, intercept, and verification purposes; and commercial mobile radio service lines.

‘Certificated provider of telecommunications service’ means a public service corporation or locality holding a certificate issued by the State Corporation Commission to provide local exchange or interexchange telephone service.

‘Locality’ has the same meaning as contained in §

15.2-102

.

‘New installation of telecommunications facilities’ or

‘new installation’
includes the construction of new pole lines and new conduit systems, and the burying of new cables in existing public rights-of-way. New installation does not include adding new cables to existing pole lines and conduit
systems.

‘Public highway’ means, for purposes of computing the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee, the centerline mileage of highways and streets which are part of the State Highway System as defined in § 33.1-25, the secondary system of highways as defined in § 33.1-67,
the highways of those cities and certain towns defined in § 33.1-41.1 and the highways and streets maintained and operated by counties which have withdrawn or elect to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the
provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 and which have not elected to return.

B. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, there is hereby established a Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to replace any and all fees of general application (except for zoning, subdivision, site plan and comprehensive plan fees of general application)
otherwise chargeable to a certificated provider of telecommunications service by the Commonwealth Transportation Board or a locality in connection with a permit for such occupation and use granted in accordance with § 56-458 or § 56-462.
Cities and towns whose public streets and roads are not maintained by the Virginia Department of Transportation, and any county that has withdrawn or elects to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the provisions
of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932, may impose the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee only by local ordinance. Localities, their authorities or commissions, and the Commonwealth Transportation Board may allow certificated
providers of telecommunications services to use their electric poles or electric conduits in exchange for payment of a fee.

C. The amount of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall be calculated annually by the Department of Transportation (VDOT), based on the calculations described in subsection D of this section. In no year shall the amount of the fee be less than fifty cents
per access line per month.

D. The annual rate of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall be calculated by multiplying the number of public highway miles in the Commonwealth by a highway mileage rate (as defined in subsection E of this section), and by adding the number of feet of
new installations in the Commonwealth (multiplied by one dollar per foot), and dividing this sum by the total number of access lines in the Commonwealth. The monthly rate shall be this annual rate divided by twelve.

E. The annual multiplier per mile is $250 from July 1, 1998, through June 30, 1999; $300 per mile for the year July 1, 1999, through June 30, 2000; $350 per mile for the year July 1, 2000, through June 30, 2001; and $425 per mile beginning July 1, 2001
and thereafter.

F. The data used for the calculation in subsection D shall be based on the following information and schedule: (i) all certificated providers of telecommunications services shall remit to VDOT by December 1 of each year data indicating the number of feet
of new installations made during the one-year period ending September 30 of that year, which shall be auditable by affected localities, and the number of access lines as of September 30 of that year, which shall be auditable by affected
localities; and (ii) the public highway mileage from the most recently published VDOT report. By the following January 15, VDOT shall calculate the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to be used in the fiscal year beginning the next ensuing
July 1 and report it to all affected localities and certificated providers of local exchange telephone services.

G. A certificated provider of local exchange telephone service shall collect the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee on a per access line basis by adding the fee to each ultimate end user’s monthly bill for local exchange telephone service. The Public Rights-of-Way
Use Fee shall, when billed, be stated as a distinct item separate and apart from the monthly charge for local exchange telephone service. Until the ultimate end user pays the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to the local exchange service
provider, the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee shall constitute a debt of the consumer to the locality or VDOT. If any ultimate end user refuses to pay the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee, the local exchange service provider shall notify
the locality or VDOT, as appropriate. After the consumer pays the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee to the local exchange service provider, such fee collected shall be deemed to be held in trust by the local exchange service provider until
remitted to the locality or VDOT.

H. Within two months after the end of each calendar quarter, each certificated provider of local exchange telephone service shall remit the amount of Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees it has billed to ultimate end users during such preceding quarter, as follows:

The certificated provider of local exchange telephone service shall remit directly to the applicable locality all Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees billed in (i) cities, (ii) towns whose public streets and roads are not maintained by VDOT, and (iii) any county
that has withdrawn or elects to withdraw from the secondary system of state highways under the provisions of § 11 of Chapter 415 of the Acts of Assembly of 1932 and that has elected not to return, provided, however, that such counties
shall use a minimum of ten percent of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees they receive for transportation construction or maintenance purposes. Any city currently subject to §

15.2-3530

shall use a minimum of ninety percent of the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees it receives for transportation construction or maintenance purposes.

The Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees billed in all other counties shall be remitted by each certificated provider of local exchange telephone service to VDOT. VDOT shall allocate the total amount received from certificated providers to the construction improvement
program of the secondary system of state highways. Within such allocation to the secondary system, VDOT shall apportion the amounts so received among the several counties, other than those described in clause (iii) of subdivision
1, on the basis of population, with each county being credited a share of the total equal to the proportion that its population bears to the total population of all such counties. For purposes of this section the term ‘population’
shall mean either population according to the latest United States census or the latest population estimate of the Weldon Cooper Center for Public Service of the University of Virginia, whichever is more recent. Such allocation
and apportionment of Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees shall be in addition to, and not in lieu of, any other allocation of funds to such secondary system and apportionment to counties thereof provided by law.

§ 56-468.2.
Reimbursement for relocation costs.

After July 1, 1998, certificated providers of telecommunications services shall receive reimbursement for eligible relocation costs incurred at the direction of a locality that imposes by ordinance the Public Rights-of-Way Use Fee or the Department of
Transportation for new installations as defined in § 56-468.1 in any public rights-of-way in accordance with §§ 56-458 and 56-462 on the basis of age and according to the following schedule. Such reimbursement shall be received
from either (i) the locality that granted the permit or franchise to use such right-of-way or (ii) the Commonwealth Transportation Board if the road or street is in the primary or secondary state highway system:

For the first three years after the completion of the installation, the certificated provider of telecommunications service shall be reimbursed 100 percent of the eligible cost for the relocation of facilities installed in the public rights-of-way.

For the fourth through sixth year after the completion of the installation, the certificated provider of telecommunications service shall be reimbursed 50 percent of the eligible cost for the relocation of facilities installed in the public rights-of-way.

Beginning in the seventh year, the certificated provider of telecommunications service shall be responsible for the cost of relocating facilities installed in the public rights-of-way.Such reimbursement shall be received from either (i) the locality that
granted the permit or franchise to use such right-of-way or (ii) the Commonwealth Transportation Board if the road or street is in the primary or secondary state highway system.

The amount of relocation reimbursement in any fiscal year to be reimbursed under this section shall not exceed the amount of Public Rights-of-Way Use Fees received by that locality either directly or through its secondary highway fund apportionment in
the preceding fiscal year. For facilities relocated in 1998 and 1999 at the direction of the locality or the Commonwealth Transportation Board, this limit on relocation reimbursement shall be the estimated annualized fees to be
collected in that locality in 1998 for 1998 relocations and in 1999 for 1999 relocations. If the relocation reimbursement limit will be exhausted on a relocation project where two or more certificated providers of telecommunications
service are eligible for relocation reimbursement, then the moneys available under the cap shall be shared by those eligible providers by prorating the reimbursement based on the reimbursement to which each provider would be entitled
absent the limit.

History.
1998, cc. 742, 758; 2015, c. 256.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1998, cc. 742 and 758, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not apply to any county having the county manager form of government.”

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “secondary highway” was substituted for “secondary road” to conform to changes by Acts 2014, c. 805.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 256 substituted “primary or secondary state highway system” for “State Highway System or the secondary system of state highways” in the last sentences of subsection A and in the second paragraph of subdivision A 3.